Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202424-211
Clerk and reporter; salaries; how fixed; duties.

(1) The Clerk of the Supreme Court shall keep his or her office at the State Capitol, be the custodian of the seal of the court, perform the duties devolving upon him or her by law, and be subject to the orders of the court. The Clerk of the Supreme Court shall receive an annual salary to be fixed by the Supreme Court.

(2) The Reporter of Decisions shall keep his or her office at the State Capitol, perform the duties devolving upon him or her by law, and be subject to the orders of the court. The Reporter of Decisions shall receive an annual salary to be fixed by the Supreme Court.

Laws 1879, § 17, p. 85;

R.S.1913, § 1144;

Laws 1921, c. 103, § 1, p. 373;

C.S.1922, § 1073;

C.S.1929, § 27-211;

R.S.1943, § 24-211;

Laws 1955, c. 78, § 1, p. 233;

Laws 1965, c. 109, § 1, p. 433;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 34;

Laws 1995, LB 271, § 3;

Laws 2023, LB799, § 3.

Clerk:

Amercement for neglect of duty, see section 25-1546.

Deputy, appointment, see section 24-401.

Not to practice as an attorney, see section 7-111.

Oaths and affirmations, power to administer, see section 24-1002.

Serves as State Librarian, see section 51-102.

Under former law, since office of clerk is constitutional office, specific appropriation of payment of salary is unnecessary. Weston v. Herdman, 64 Neb. 24, 89 N.W. 384 (1902).

Salary provided is exclusive mode of compensation. In re Brown, 15 Neb. 688, 50 N.W. 273 (1884).